District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.15

Attendance at pistol matches.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to pay the expenses of officers and members of the Metropolitan Police Department and the Department of Corrections for attending pistol matches, including entrance fees, and is further authorized to permit officers and members to attend such matches without loss of pay or time.

History

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 506, Pub. L. 93-140, § 10

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-187.
1973 Ed., § 4-189.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.